Washington statutes.
RCW 11.42.130

Claim of notice agent or beneficiary—Payment.

A claim of the notice agent or other person who has received property by reason of the decedent's death must be paid as set forth in RCW 11.42.090(3).

[ 1997 c 252 s 38; 1994 c 221 s 43.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.